Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 5. TRANSPORTATION

SUBTITLE A. NAVIGATION DISTRICTS AND PORT AUTHORITIES

CHAPTER 5005. VICTORIA COUNTY NAVIGATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 5005.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of navigation and canal commissioners of the Victoria County Navigation District.

(2) "District" means the Victoria County Navigation District.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 2368), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD

Sec. 5005.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The district is governed by a board of five navigation and canal commissioners appointed by the Commissioners Court of Victoria County.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (H.B. 2368), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.